Washington statutes.
RCW 36.71.070

Hawkers, auctioneers, and barterers must procure license—Exceptions.

(1) If any person sells any goods, wares, or merchandise, at auction or public outcry, or barters goods, wares or merchandise from traveling boats, wagons, carts or vehicles of any kind, or from any pack, basket or other package carried on foot without first having obtained a license therefor from the board of county commissioners of the county in which such goods are sold or bartered, he or she shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than five nor more than fifty dollars, and shall stand committed to the county jail of the county in which the conviction is had until such fine and cost of prosecution are paid, or discharged by due course of law: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed as to apply to any seagoing craft or to administrators or executors selling property of deceased persons, or to private individuals selling their household property, or furniture, or farming tools, implements, or livestock, or any produce grown or raised by them, either at public auction or private sale.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, counties shall not license auctioneers that are licensed by the state under chapter 18.11 RCW.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4124; 1984 c 189 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.71.070. Prior: 1879 p 130 s 1; 1873 p 437 s 1; RRS s 8341.]